Mississippi, session 2026, SB2209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Public Safety and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall coordinate to provide enhanced security measures and promote collaboration among law enforcement on university campuses for large events.  The Department of Public Safety shall have the ultimate authority for oversight of the administration of this act. (2)  The Department of Public Safety shall: (a)  Strengthen campus law enforcement coordination, ensuring that university, municipal, county and state law enforcement operate in a unified command during high-risk events; (b)  Formalize intelligence sharing, joint patrols, and rapid response protocols for all law enforcement; (c)  Ensure the implementation of stricter access control and screening at large events; (d)  Adopt threat assessment and behavioral monitoring to proactively identify individuals or patterns of behavior that signal risk, ensuring opportunities for early intervention; (e)  Ensure adequate support for mental health and conflict resolution resources, expanding counseling, mediation, and conflict de-escalation training for law enforcement; (f)  Promote community and student engagement, utilizing awareness campaigns, anonymous tip lines, safety ambassadors, and peer-to-peer accountability; and (g)  Develop, in coordination with the Department of Information Technology Services, a tip submission platform, with the option of anonymity provided to the submitter. (3)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall require all of the institutions of higher learning to publish a prominent link on their own websites to the tip submission platform developed by the Department of Public Safety. SECTION 2.  Section 45-1-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-1-2.  (1)  The Executive Director of the Department of Public Safety shall be the Commissioner of Public Safety. (2)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Public Safety, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law including, but not limited to: (a)  Office of Public Safety Planning; (b)  Office of Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol; (c)  Office of Mississippi Bureau of Investigation (to be directed by a Lieutenant Colonel of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol); (d)  Office of Forensic Laboratories, which includes the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and the Office of the State Medical Examiner; (e)  Office of Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy; (f)  Office of Support Services; (g)  Office of Narcotics, which shall be known as the Bureau of Narcotics; (h)  Office of Homeland Security; (i)  Office of Capitol Police; (j)  Office of Driver Service Bureau; and (k)  Office of Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division. (3)  The department shall be headed by a commissioner, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor.  The appointment of the commissioner shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall have, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university. (4)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner shall appoint heads of offices, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The commissioner shall have the authority to organize the offices established by subsection (2) of this section as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department.  The commissioner may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the department's lawful functions.  The organization charts of the department shall be presented annually with the budget request of the Governor for review by the Legislature. (5)  The commissioner shall appoint, from within the Department of Public Safety, a statewide safety training officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and whose duty it shall be to perform public training for both law enforcement and private persons throughout the state concerning proper emergency response to the mentally ill, terroristic threats or acts, domestic conflict, other conflict resolution, and such other matters as the commissioner may direct. (6)  The commissioner shall appoint, from within the Department of Public Safety, a statewide safety training officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and whose duty it shall be to perform public training for campus law enforcement to effectuate the purposes of Section 1 of this act. ( * * *67)  The commissioner, after consultation with the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police and the Mississippi Sheriffs' Association, shall be responsible for establishing guidelines for response to active shooter situations and any related jurisdictional issues. ( * * *78)  The commissioner shall establish within the department the Mississippi Office of Homeland Security for the purpose of seeing that the laws are faithfully executed and for the purpose of investigating cyber-related crimes and suppressing crimes of violence and acts of intimidation and terror.  The commissioner is hereby authorized to employ within the Office of Homeland Security a director, investigators and other qualified personnel as he may deem necessary to make investigation of cyber-related crimes, crimes of violence and acts of terrorism or intimidation, to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with such cyber-related crimes, crimes of violence, acts of terrorism or intimidation, or threats of violence and to perform other duties as necessary to accomplish these purposes. Investigators and other law enforcement personnel employed by the commissioner shall have full power to investigate, apprehend, and arrest persons committing cyber-related crimes, acts of violence, intimidation, or terrorism anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of police officers in the performance of such duties as provided herein.  Such investigators and other personnel shall perform their duties under the direction of the commissioner, or his designee.  The commissioner shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to other persons for aiding in such investigation and in the apprehension and conviction of persons charged with cyber-related crimes, acts of violence, or threats of violence, or intimidation, or acts of terrorism. ( * * *89)  The commissioner shall establish within the Office of Homeland Security a Mississippi Analysis and Information Center (MSAIC Fusion Center) which shall be the highest priority for the allocation of available federal resources for statewide information sharing, including the deployment of personnel and connectivity with federal data systems.  Subject to appropriation therefor, the Mississippi Fusion Center shall employ three (3) regional analysts dedicated to analyzing and resolving potential threats identified by the agency's statewide social media intelligence platform and the dissemination of school safety information. SECTION 3.  Section 45-1-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-1-3.  (1)  When not otherwise specifically provided, the commissioner is authorized to make and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to be coordinated, and carry out the general provisions of the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver's License Law of 1938. (2)  The commissioner shall have the authority to administer oaths. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with written approval from the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, the commissioner may enter into a lease or sublease agreement for space in the Department of Public Safety headquarters building with a third party for the purpose of providing services and assistance to the department and its employees.  The proceeds received from the lease under this subsection shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit into the General Fund. SECTION 4.  Section 37-101-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-101-15.  (a)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall succeed to and continue to exercise control of all records, books, papers, equipment, and supplies, and all lands, buildings, and other real and personal property belonging to or assigned to the use and benefit of the board of trustees formerly supervising and controlling the institutions of higher learning named in Section 37-101-1.  The board shall have and exercise control of the use, distribution and disbursement of all funds, appropriations and taxes, now and hereafter in possession, levied and collected, received, or appropriated for the use, benefit, support, and maintenance or capital outlay expenditures of the institutions of higher learning, including the authorization of employees to sign vouchers for the disbursement of funds for the various institutions, except where otherwise specifically provided by law. (b)  The board shall have general supervision of the affairs of all the institutions of higher learning, including the departments and the schools thereof.  The board shall have the power in its discretion to determine who shall be privileged to enter, to remain in, or to graduate therefrom.  The board shall have general supervision of the conduct of libraries and laboratories, the care of dormitories, buildings, and grounds; the business methods and arrangement of accounts and records; the organization of the administrative plan of each institution; and all other matters incident to the proper functioning of the institutions.  The board shall have the authority to establish minimum standards of achievement as a prerequisite for entrance into any of the institutions under its jurisdiction, which standards need not be uniform between the various institutions and which may be based upon such criteria as the board may establish. (c)  The board shall exercise all the powers and prerogatives conferred upon it under the laws establishing and providing for the operation of the several institutions herein specified.  The board shall adopt such bylaws and regulations from time to time as it deems expedient for the proper supervision and control of the several institutions of higher learning, insofar as such bylaws and regulations are not repugnant to the Constitution and laws, and not inconsistent with the object for which these institutions were established.  The board shall have power and authority to prescribe rules and regulations for policing the campuses and all buildings of the respective institutions, to authorize the arrest of all persons violating on any campus any criminal law of the state, and to have such law violators turned over to the civil authorities. (d)  For all institutions specified herein, the board shall provide a uniform system of recording and of accounting approved by the State Department of Audit.  The board shall annually prepare, or cause to be prepared, a budget for each institution of higher learning for the succeeding year which must be prepared and in readiness for at least thirty (30) days before the convening of the regular session of the Legislature.  All relationships and negotiations between the State Legislature and its various committees and the institutions named herein shall be carried on through the board of trustees.  No official, employee or agent representing any of the separate institutions shall appear before the Legislature or any committee thereof except upon the written order of the board or upon the request of the Legislature or a committee thereof. (e)  For all institutions specified herein, the board shall prepare an annual report to the Legislature setting forth the disbursements of all monies appropriated to the respective institutions.  Each report to the Legislature shall show how the money appropriated to the several institutions has been expended, beginning and ending with the fiscal years of the institutions, showing the name of each teacher, officer, and employee, and the salary paid each, and an itemized statement of each and every item of receipts and expenditures.  Each report must be balanced, and must begin with the former balance.  If any property belonging to the state or the institution is used for profit, the reports shall show the expense incurred in managing the property and the amount received therefrom.  The reports shall also show a summary of the gross receipts and gross disbursements for each year and shall show the money on hand at the beginning of the fiscal period of the institution next preceding each session of the Legislature and the necessary amount of expense to be incurred from said date to January 1 following.  The board shall keep the annual expenditures of each institution herein mentioned within the income derived from legislative appropriations and other sources, but in case of emergency arising from acts of providence, epidemics, fire or storm with the written approval of the Governor and by written consent of a majority of the senators and of the representatives it may exceed the income.  The board shall require a surety bond in a surety company authorized to do business in this state of every employee who is the custodian of funds belonging to one or more of the institutions mentioned herein, which bond shall be in a sum to be fixed by the board in an amount that will properly safeguard the said funds, the premium for which shall be paid out of the funds appropriated for said institutions. (f)  The board shall have the power and authority to elect the heads of the various institutions of higher learning and to contract with all deans, professors, and other members of the teaching staff, and all administrative employees of said institutions for a term not exceeding four (4) years.  The board shall have the power and authority to terminate any such contract at any time for malfeasance, inefficiency, or contumacious conduct, but never for political reasons.  It shall be the policy of the board to permit the executive head of each institution to nominate for election by the board all subordinate employees of the institution over which he presides.  It shall be the policy of the board to elect all officials for a definite tenure of service and to reelect during the period of satisfactory service.  The board shall have the power to make any adjustments it thinks necessary between the various departments and schools of any institution or between the different institutions. (g)  The board shall keep complete minutes and records of all proceedings which shall be open for inspection by any citizen of the state. (h)  The board shall have the power to enter into an energy performance contract, energy services contract, on a shared-savings, lease or lease-purchase basis, for energy efficiency services and/or equipment as prescribed in Section 31-7-14. (i)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, for and on behalf of Jackson State University, is hereby authorized to convey by donation or otherwise easements across portions of certain real estate located in the City of Jackson, Hinds County, Mississippi, for right-of-way required for the Metro Parkway Project. (j)  In connection with any international contract between the board or one (1) of the state's institutions of higher learning and any party outside of the United States, the board or institution that is the party to the international contract is hereby authorized and empowered to include in the contract a provision for the resolution by arbitration of any controversy between the parties to the contract relating to such contract or the failure or refusal to perform any part of the contract.  Such provision shall be valid, enforceable and irrevocable without regard to the justiciable character of the controversy. Provided, however, that in the event either party to such contract initiates litigation against the other with respect to the contract, the arbitration provision shall be deemed waived unless asserted as a defense on or before the responding party is required to answer such litigation. (k)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning ("board"), on behalf of any institution under its jurisdiction, shall purchase and maintain business property insurance and business personal property insurance on all university-owned buildings and/or contents as required by federal law and regulations of the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) as is necessary for receiving public assistance or reimbursement for repair, reconstruction, replacement or other damage to those buildings and/or contents caused by the Hurricane Katrina Disaster of 2005 or subsequent disasters.  The board is authorized to expend funds from any available source for the purpose of obtaining and maintaining that property insurance.  The board is authorized to enter into agreements with the Department of Finance and Administration, local school districts, community/junior college districts, community hospitals and/or other state agencies to pool their liabilities to participate in a group business property and/or business personal property insurance program, subject to uniform rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration. (l)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or its designee, may approve the payment or reimbursement of reasonable travel expenses incurred by candidates for open positions at the board's executive office or at any of the state institutions of higher learning, when the job candidate has incurred expenses in traveling to a job interview at the request of the board, the Commissioner of Higher Education or a state institution of higher learning administrator. (m)  (i)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning is authorized to administer and approve contracts for the construction and maintenance of buildings and other facilities of the state institutions of higher learning, including related contracts for architectural and engineering services, which are paid for with self-generated funds. (ii)  Additionally, the board is authorized to oversee, administer and approve contracts for the construction and maintenance of buildings and other facilities of the state institutions of higher learning, including related contracts for architectural and engineering services, which are funded in whole or in part by general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi at institutions designated annually by the board as being capable to procure and administer all such contracts.  Prior to the disbursement of funds, an agreement for each project between the institution and the Department of Finance and Administration shall be executed.  The approval and execution of the agreement shall not be withheld by either party unless the withholding party provides a written, detailed explanation of the basis for withholding to the other party.  The agreement shall stipulate the responsibilities of each party, applicable procurement regulations, documentation and reporting requirements, conditions prior to, and schedule of, disbursement of general obligation bond funds to the institution and provisions concerning handling any remaining general obligation bonds at the completion of the project.  Such agreement shall not include provisions that constitute additional qualifications or criteria that act to invalidate the designation of an institution as capable of procuring and administering such project.  Inclusion of any such provisions may be appealed to the Public Procurement Review Board. (n)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning ("board") shall require all on-campus faculty and staff employed by, and all students attending, any of the state institutions of higher learning identified in Section 37-101-1 to be issued an identification badge in physical or electronic format.  Any identification card issued or renewed pursuant to this section, whether physical or in an electronic format, shall include the words "Crisis Lifeline - Dial or Text 988, or chat 988lifeline.org" or like language for formatting purposes. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.